Utah statutes.
78B-11-107.   Validity of agreement to arbitrate.
(1)  An agreement contained in a record to submit to arbitration any existing
or subsequent controversy arising between the parties to the agreement is
valid, enforceable, and irrevocable except upon a ground that exists at law or
in equity for the revocation of a contract.
(2)  The court shall decide whether an agreement to arbitrate exists or a
controversy is subject to an agreement to arbitrate.
(3)  An arbitrator shall decide whether a condition precedent to arbitrability
has been fulfilled and whether a contract containing a valid agreement to
arbitrate is enforceable.
(4)  If a party to a judicial proceeding challenges the existence of, or
claims that a controversy is not subject to, an agreement to arbitrate, the
arbitration proceeding may continue pending final resolution of the issue by
the court, unless the court otherwise orders.
